Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-12,252
Incentives; application by household; contents.

To be eligible for incentives from new taxpayer recruitment programs funded by grants under the New Taxpayer Recruitment Grant Act, a household shall submit an application to a grant recipient for the new taxpayer recruitment program of such grant recipient that includes:

(1) The name, date of birth, email address, telephone number, and last four digits of the social security number for an individual who will serve as the primary point of contact for the household;

(2) The name, date of birth, and relationship to the primary point of contact for all members of the household;

(3) The mailing address for the primary place of residence for the household. Such address shall be outside of the State of Nebraska at the time the household applies for new taxpayer recruitment program incentives;

(4) Records deemed sufficient by the grant recipient to demonstrate proof of employment and income for each employed individual in the household and a brief job description for each employed individual. Such records shall demonstrate a household annual income of at least fifty-five thousand dollars to be eligible for new taxpayer recruitment program incentives; and

(5) Whether any members of the household are veterans.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 112.
July 18, 2026